New York, session 2025-2026, A3592.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 8 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 2 530.12 of the criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new clause 3 (C) to read as follows: 4 (C) Upon motion and after an opportunity to be heard, the court may 5 order the defendant to turn control of a connected device over to a 6 family or household member or, if that is not possible, to have such 7 connected device disabled by the manufacturer. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07670-01-5